Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB789.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 613.1. General Appropriation Bill.--If the general 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 appropriation bill is not enacted by the constitutional deadline of June 30 in any year, the Commonwealth shall maintain State appropriations at 80% of the amounts specified in the general appropriation act for the most recent fiscal year.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0789PN0867 - 2 - 12345